Maine, session 132, LD1237.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 22 MRSA §1708, sub-§3, ¶E, as amended by PL 2013, c. 594, §1, is further
amended by amending subparagraph (2) to read:
(2) Uses the applicable regional inflation factor as established by a national
economic research organization selected by the department to adjust costs other
than labor costs or fixed costs; and
Sec. 2. 22 MRSA §1708, sub-§3, ¶F, as amended by PL 2021, c. 29, Pt. R, §1, is
further amended to read:
F. Establish a nursing facility's base year every 2 years and increase the rate of
reimbursement beginning July 1, 2014 and every year thereafter until June 30, 2018.
For the state fiscal year beginning July 1, 2018, the base year for each facility is its
fiscal year that ended in the calendar year 2016. For state fiscal years beginning on or
after July 1, 2019, subsequent rebasing must be based on the most recent cost report
filings available. The department may provide a mechanism for subsequent
adjustments to base year costs to reflect any material difference between as-filed cost
reports used in rebasing and subsequent determinations of audited, allowable costs for
the same fiscal period. The department's rules must provide that, beginning in the state
fiscal year beginning July 1, 2018, the rates set for each rebasing year must include an
inflation adjustment for a cost-of-living percentage change in nursing facility
reimbursement each year in accordance with the United States Department of Labor,
Bureau of Labor Statistics Consumer Price Index nursing homes and adult day care
services index.
Any rebasing done pursuant to this paragraph may not result in a nursing facility
receiving a reimbursement rate that is lower than the rate in effect on June 30, 2018.;
and
Sec. 3. 22 MRSA §1708, sub-§3, ¶G is enacted to read:
G. Determine the likely impact on small, rural, isolated and island facilities to reduce
impacts on the communities where those facilities are located as well as the impact on
safety and quality of services.
Sec. 4. 22 MRSA §1834 is enacted to read:
§1834. Nursing facility staffing
The department is authorized to adopt rules to govern staffing requirements for nursing
facilities. The department shall consider the likely impact of staffing requirements on
small, rural, isolated and island facilities and may adopt different staffing level
requirements that are specific to their unique circumstances. Rules adopted pursuant to this
section are routine technical rules as defined in Title 5, chapter 375, subchapter 2-A.
Sec. 5. Department of Health and Human Services to amend rules. By
January 1, 2026, the Department of Health and Human Services shall amend its rules in
Chapter 101: MaineCare Benefits Manual, Chapter II, Section 2, Chapter III, Section 2 and
Chapter III, Section 97, Appendix C in order to provide supplemental MaineCare
reimbursement to adult family care homes and residential care facilities that have fewer
than 10 beds or are at least 35 miles away from the nearest similar facility. The rules must
Page 1 - 132LR2179(01)

413 provide eligible small or isolated facilities with a supplemental payment of 10% to be added
424 to their MaineCare rate.
Sec. 6. Medicaid state plan amendment. The Department of Health and Human
Services shall prepare and submit a Medicaid state plan amendment to the United States
Department of Health and Human Services, Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services
that provides supplemental reimbursement to adult family care homes and residential care
facilities that have fewer than 10 beds or are at least 35 miles away from the nearest similar
facility pursuant to section 5.